Washington statutes.
RCW 42.30.250

Notices soliciting public comment—Time period.

(1) A public agency that is required by state law to solicit public comment for a statutorily specified period of time, and is required by state law to provide notice that it is soliciting public comment, must specify the first and last date and time by which written public comment may be submitted.

(2) An agency that provides a notice that violates this section is subject to the same fines under the same procedures as other violations of this chapter are subject to under RCW 42.30.120.

[ 2024 c 171 s 1.]